District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.08

Conduct of the meeting.

(a)

At each meeting of shareholders, a chair shall preside. The chair shall be appointed as provided in the bylaws or, in the absence of such provision, by the board.

(b)

The chair, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, shall determine the order of business and may establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

(c)

Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to shareholders.

(d)

The chair of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no ballots, proxies, or votes, or any revocations or changes thereto, shall be accepted.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720